test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VAI_VV_IMP_boodwe_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI+Imp - VV - boodwe :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2: boodwen
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: boodweg
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: boodwedaa
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Del+2: boodwekan
     #gwekshin+VAI+Imp+Del+21Pl: UNKNOWN
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: boodwekeg
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Neg+2: boodweke
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Neg+2+Pl: boodwekego
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl: boodwesiidaa
